Louisiana, session 2026, HB1163.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:652(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§652. Proper naming; certification on shipping cases; time for selling; exceptions;
sale and storage in homes prohibited
* * *
B. Permissible items of fireworks, enumerated in R.S. 51:651, may be sold
at retail only from noon June sixteenth through midnight July fifth and noon
December fifteenth through midnight January first of each calendar year. at any time.
* * *